Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.560

Office of renewable fuels—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout RCW 43.330.565, 43.330.570, and 43.330.575 unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(2) "Green electrolytic hydrogen" means hydrogen produced through electrolysis and does not include hydrogen manufactured using steam reforming or any other conversion technology that produces hydrogen from a fossil fuel feedstock.

(3) "Office" means the statewide office of renewable fuels established in RCW 43.330.565.

(4) "Overburdened communities" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 70A.02.010.

(5) "Renewable fuel" means fuel produced using renewable resources and includes renewable hydrogen.

(6) "Renewable hydrogen" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 54.04.190.

(7) "Renewable resource" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 19.405.020.

[ 2022 c 292 s 101.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 292: See note following RCW 43.330.565.